Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0938.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 281. (1) For tax years that begin on and after January 1, 2026, a qualified taxpayer that sells a mobile home park or seasonal mobile home park during the tax year to a resident of the mobile home park or seasonal mobile home park or a resident's association or cooperative after giving notice of the intent to sell to another person as required under section 30m of the mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2330m, may claim a credit against the tax imposed under this part in an amount equal to 15% of the purchase price. To claim the credit, the qualified taxpayer must submit a copy of the notice required under section 30m of the mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2330m, and a copy of the settlement statement related to the purchase with the annual return filed under this part on which the credit under this section is claimed. (2) For a taxpayer who is a member of a flow-through entity that qualifies for the credit under this section, that taxpayer may claim a credit against the member's tax liability under this part based on the member's distributive share of business income reported from that flow-through entity or an alternative method approved by the department. (3) If the amount of the credit allowed under this section exceeds the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year, that portion of the credit that exceeds the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year shall not be refunded. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Mobile home park" and "seasonal mobile home park" mean those terms as defined in section 2 of the mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2302. (b) "Qualified taxpayer" means a taxpayer that is the owner of a mobile home park or a seasonal mobile home park and is licensed under the mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2301 to 125.2350. Sec. 678. (1) For tax years that begin on and after January 1, 2026, a qualified taxpayer that sells a mobile home park or seasonal mobile home park during the tax year to a resident of the mobile home park or seasonal mobile home park or a resident's association or cooperative after giving notice of the intent to sell to another person as required under section 30m of the mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2330m, may claim a credit against the tax imposed under this part in an amount equal to 15% of the purchase price. To claim the credit, the qualified taxpayer must submit a copy of the notice required under section 30m of the mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2330m, and a copy of the settlement statement related to the purchase with the annual return filed under this part on which the credit under this section is claimed. (2) If the amount of the credit allowed under this section exceeds the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year, that portion of the credit that exceeds the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year shall not be refunded. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Mobile home park" and "seasonal mobile home park" mean those terms as defined in section 2 of the mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2302. (b) "Qualified taxpayer" means a taxpayer that is the owner of a mobile home park or a seasonal mobile home park and is licensed under the mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2301 to 125.2350. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 937 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.